Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.065

Commission's adjudication of unfair labor practices—Rules—Binding arbitration authorized.

The commission may adjudicate any unfair labor practices alleged by a board of trustees or an employee organization and shall adopt reasonable rules to administer this section, except that a complaint must not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court. However, the parties may agree to seek relief from unfair labor practices through binding arbitration.

[ 2018 c 252 s 7; 1987 c 314 s 10.]